District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.33

Compensation from more than one source.

(a)

Except as provided in this chapter, no person shall be ineligible to serve or to receive compensation as a member of the Board of Elections because he occupies another office or position or because he receives compensation (including retirement compensation) from another source.

(b)

The right to another office or position or to compensation from another source otherwise secured to such a person under the laws of the United States shall not be abridged by the fact of his service or receipt of compensation as a member of such Board, if such service does not interfere with the discharge of his duties in such other office or position.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 822, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 733
Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 458, Pub. L. 93-376, title III, § 306(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1305.
1973 Ed., § 1-1104a.